Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 7
DISCOVERY PROJECT STEERING COMMITTEE

16-9-701. Discovery project steering committee.

There is created the discovery project steering committee convened to assist in developing a request for proposal application and selection process to choose a vendor to develop a statewide discovery sharing system. The steering committee consists of:

The attorney general or the attorney general's designee, who shall serve as the chair of the steering committee;

The state court administrator or the state court administrator's designee, who shall serve as the vice-chair of the steering committee;

The state public defender or the state public defender's designee;

A representative of the criminal defense bar appointed by the chief justice;

A district court judge appointed by the chief justice;

Three district attorneys appointed by the governor, one representing an urban judicial district, one representing a mid-sized district, and one representing a rural district;

A county sheriff appointed by the governor;

A chief of police appointed by the governor; and

The alternate defense counsel or the alternate defense counsel's designee.

The project steering committee must also have a nonvoting member appointed by the governor from the office of information technology who serves only as a technology advisor to assist the steering committee.

Repealed.

The discovery project steering committee shall develop benchmarks and contractual requirements for the statewide discovery sharing system.

The Colorado district attorneys' council shall enter into a contract with the selected vendor to complete the system by June 30, 2017. The contract must include the benchmarks and requirements developed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4). The executive director of the Colorado district attorneys' council shall provide periodic reports to the steering committee and the joint budget committee regarding benchmarks and requirements and the progress of the development of the system. It is not necessary for the steering committee to meet to receive the periodic reports.

The discovery project steering committee may meet as necessary to provide practical and technical support for the maintenance and enhancement of the system and to ensure that the system is meeting the needs of the criminal justice system.

Once the statewide discovery sharing system is operational, a district attorney or the Colorado district attorneys' council, who, after making a good-faith effort to redact all information from a discovery document provided to a defendant or defense counsel, provides a document that contains information that is legally required to be redacted, is not liable for civil damages as a result of acts or omissions related to providing discovery documents that contain information required to be redacted that is not redacted.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (SB 13-246), ch. 269, p. 1414, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-190), ch. 275, p. 1104, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2016:

(2) and (3) repealed and (4)(b) amended, (SB 16-091), ch. 52, p. 121, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 22, § 25, effective February 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-190, see section 1 of chapter 275, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

16-9-702. Statewide discovery sharing system.

The Colorado district attorneys' council shall develop and maintain a statewide discovery sharing system integrated with its ACTION system. The statewide discovery sharing system must be operational by July 1, 2017. The Colorado district attorneys' council shall maintain and operate the system with the assistance of the discovery project steering committee created in section 16-9-701.

The general assembly shall appropriate the necessary moneys from the general fund and the statewide discovery sharing system surcharge fund created in section 18-26-102 (2), C.R.S., to fund the development, continuing enhancement, and maintenance of the statewide discovery sharing system and maintenance and continuing enhancement of the existing ACTION system operated by the Colorado district attorneys' council. The judicial department shall allocate the appropriated moneys to the Colorado district attorneys' council for the development, continuing enhancement, and maintenance of the statewide discovery sharing system and the existing ACTION system.

The Colorado district attorneys' council shall provide the judicial department financial reports regarding the statewide discovery sharing system. The judicial department shall use the reports in preparing its annual budget request. The reports must include the following:

Actual expenditures of the moneys appropriated for the maintenance of the ACTION system and for the development, enhancement, implementation, and maintenance of the discovery sharing system so that the judicial department can include the expenditure data in its annual budget request. The judicial department shall require the Colorado district attorneys' council to provide the information in a format that is consistent with actual expenditures reported for other line item appropriations.

The amount of state funding requested for the next fiscal year for such purpose, including a breakdown and justification for the amount requested.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-190), ch. 275, p. 1107, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-091), ch. 52, p. 122, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-190, see section 1 of chapter 275, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.